Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1804
Inquest; coroner's jury; vacancies; oath.

If any juror fails to appear, the coroner shall cause the proper number to be summoned or returned from the bystanders immediately, and proceed to impanel them and administer the following oath in substance: You do solemnly swear that you will diligently inquire and true presentment make, when, how, and by what means the person whose body lies here dead came to his or her death, according to your knowledge and the evidence given you, so help you God.

Laws 1879, § 100, p. 381;

R.S.1913, § 5666;

C.S.1922, § 4996;

C.S.1929, § 26-1505;

R.S.1943, § 23-1804;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 71.